Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1722, as
amended by Section 255, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1722), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1722. A. Any person who shall unlawfully take any
crude oil or gasoline, or any product thereof, from any pipe,
pipeline, tank, tank car, or other receptacle or container and any
person who shall unlawfully take or cause to be taken any machinery,
drilling mud, pipes, fittings, pumps, and all other equipment or
other materials necessary for the drilling or production of oil or
gas wells, with intent to deprive the owner or lessee thereof of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4170 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

said crude oil, gas, gasoline, or any product thereof, machinery,
drilling mud, pipes, fittings, pumps, and all other equipment or
other materials necessary for the drilling or production of oil or
gas wells shall:
1. Be guilty of a misdemeanor if the value of said product so
taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county
jail for a term not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by both such fine
and imprisonment; and
2. Be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense if the value of such
product so taken is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more and,
upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by forfeiture of the
instrumentality of the crime and by a fine of not less than One
Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00), or by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term in the range of one (1)
year to ten (10) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person violating the provisions of this section who:
1. Takes such product and causes environmental damage to the
real property as a direct result of the taking of such product; and
2. The direct costs of remediation or restoration of the
environmentally damaged real property exceeds the amount of Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00),
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4170 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
April 16, 2026 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4170 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)